Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 13. Fiduciary Investments

§ 91-13-1.
Investment by fiduciaries of funds held in trust.

All trustees, guardians, and other fiduciaries in this state, unless prohibited by the will, deed, or trust instrument of the testator or other person establishing the trust, agency, or fiduciary relationship, or unless by any such instrument another mode of investment is prescribed, may, in addition to methods of investment now authorized by law, invest all funds held in trust or for investment as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 421.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 212, §§ 1-7.

§ 91-13-3.
Authority to prudently invest in all property.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling, and managing property held in fiduciary capacity, the fiduciary shall exercise the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing which men of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation, but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital.

Within the limitations of the foregoing standard, a fiduciary is authorized to acquire and retain every kind of property, real, personal, or mixed, and every kind of investment, specifically including, but not by way of limitation, shares or interests in common trust funds, securities of any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as from time to time amended and, in addition, bonds, preferred stocks, or common stocks listed on a national securities exchange registered with the securities and exchange commission, which men of prudence, discretion, and intelligence acquire or retain for their own account. Within the limitations of the foregoing standard, a fiduciary may retain property properly acquired, without limitation as to time and without regard to its suitability for original purchase.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 421.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 212, §§ 1-7.

§ 91-13-5.
“Legal investment” construed.

Whenever the express terms or limitations set forth in any will, agreement, court order, or other instrument use the terms “legal investment” or “authorized investment” or words of similar import, such words shall be conclusively presumed to mean any investment authorized or permitted by Section 91-13-3.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 421.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 212, §§ 1-7.

§ 91-13-6.
Federally insured accounts and certificates of deposit as legal investments.

All trustees, guardians, administrators, executors and other fiduciaries may, without court order, if not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree or order establishing the fiduciary relationship, invest or deposit funds held in a fiduciary capacity in time certificates of deposit, savings accounts or other interest-bearing accounts of (a) any state or national bank (including itself, if such fiduciary be a bank) whose main office is located in the state and the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or (b) any state or federal savings and loan association (including itself, if such fiduciary be a savings and loan association) whose main office is located in the state and the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 91-13-7.
General powers of courts not affected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit the power of a court of competent jurisdiction to permit a fiduciary to take any action authorized, or to restrain a fiduciary from taking any action prohibited by a decree of such court, notwithstanding the permissions or restrictions contained in any written instrument under which such fiduciary is acting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 421.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 212, §§ 1-7.

§ 91-13-8.
Direct obligations of United States of America to include interests in certain open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust.

All trustees, guardians, administrators, executors and other fiduciaries, whenever a governing instrument or order directs, requires, authorizes or permits investment in direct obligations of the United States of America, may invest in such obligations either directly or in the form of securities of, or other interests in, any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 80(a)-1 et seq., provided that the portfolio of such investment company or investment trust is limited to direct obligations of the United States of America and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by direct obligations of the United States of America, and that such investment company or investment trust takes delivery of the collateral for any repurchase agreement, either directly or through an authorized custodian. This section shall not be construed to apply to the investment of any public funds; provided, however, that this section shall be construed to apply to the investment of public funds deposited with a bank trustee acting in a fiduciary capacity in connection with the sale and redemption of bonds, notes and other certificates of indebtedness, notwithstanding Section 31-19-5, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 572, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 91-13-9.
Application of chapter.

Fiduciaries acting under authority heretofore or hereafter granted shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

The powers granted by this chapter to trustees, guardians, and other fiduciaries shall be in addition to the powers existing by virtue of other laws heretofore enacted authorizing investments by fiduciaries.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 421.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 212, §§ 1-7.

§ 91-13-11.
Tennessee Valley Authority bonds and obligations as legal investments.

All bonds and other obligations issued by the Tennessee Valley Authority under the provisions of the Tennessee Valley Authority Act of 1933, as heretofore or hereafter amended, shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, for the public employees’ retirement system of Mississippi, and for banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and obligations shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 421.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 179.